Connecticut, session 2026, SB00036.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That (1) subsection (b) of section 14-49b of the general statutes be
amended to decrease the "Passport to the Parks Fee" imposed on the
registration of a motor vehicle from twenty-four dollars to twenty
dollars, and (2) subsection (c) of section 23-26 of the general statutes be
amended to increase the fee for a nonresident calendar year parking
pass at any state park, forest, boat launch or other state recreational
facility from one hundred twelve dollars to one hundred seventy-five
dollars.